Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4310.01
Tax proceeds; distribution.

Proceeds of the tax imposed by section 77-4303 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:

(1) Five percent of such proceeds shall be credited to the Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund; and

(2) Of the remaining proceeds:

(a) Fifty percent shall be remitted to the respective counties from which the proceeds originated for credit to the County Drug Law Enforcement and Education Fund of each such county. Money remitted to a county pursuant to this subdivision shall be remitted to the county treasurer of such county for credit to such fund. For purposes of this subdivision, county from which the proceeds originated shall mean: (i) If the proceeds result from seizure under the Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act of property located in a county other than the county in which the dealer resides, the county in which the seizure was made; and (ii) in all other cases, the county in which the dealer resides; and

(b) All remaining funds, including those which did not originate in a county, shall be credited to the Nebraska State Patrol Drug Control and Education Cash Fund.

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 31.

Uniform State Tax Lien Registration and Enforcement Act, see section 77-3901.